Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 4 Hearings and Investigations

39-4-1.
Investigation of personal injuries and deaths.

Every public utility shall, whenever any accident attended with loss of human life, or serious injury occurs within this state, directly or indirectly arising from or connected with its maintenance or operation, give immediate notice thereof to the division. In the event of any accident, the division, if it deems that the public interest requires it, shall cause an investigation to be made forthwith, which investigation shall be held in the locality of the accident, unless for the greater convenience of those concerned, it shall order the investigation to be held at some other place; and the investigation may be adjourned from place to place as may be found necessary and convenient. The division shall reasonably notify the public utility of the time and place of the investigation. The notice required by this section to be given shall not be admitted as evidence or used for any purpose against the public utility giving notice, in any suit, action, or proceeding brought for damages growing out of any matter mentioned in the notice; nor shall the notice be admitted as evidence or be used for any purpose in any criminal proceeding brought against the public utility giving notice, or against any of its officers, agents, or employees, growing out of any matter mentioned in the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-1

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-2.
Order to repair or make changes in plant or equipment.

Whenever the commission shall find upon a hearing and an investigation that the plant or equipment of any public utility is inadequate, insufficient, or unsuited to the public needs, or that repairs, improvements, or changes in the plant or equipment ought reasonably to be made, or that an addition to, alteration, or extension of the plant or equipment of any public utility ought reasonably to be made, the commission shall order that the repairs, improvements, changes, additions, alterations, or extensions to the plant or equipment be made within a reasonable time and in the manner specified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 7.

39-4-3.
Investigations on complaint against utility — “Safe and potable” defined.

Upon a written complaint made against any public utility by any city or town council, or by the water supply management division of the department of environmental management, or by any corporation, or by any twenty-five (25) qualified electors, that any of the rates, tolls, charges, or any joint rate or rates of any public utility are in any respect unreasonable or unjustly discriminatory, or that any regulation, measurement, practice, or act whatsoever of any public utility, affecting or relating to the conveyance of persons or property, including sewage, or any service in connection therewith, or the conveyance of any telephone or telegraph message or any service in connection therewith, is in any respect unreasonable, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory, or that any service is inadequate or cannot be obtained or is unsafe, or the public safety is endangered thereby, or in the case of drinking water that the water is either unsafe or nonpotable, or that the water supplier is in noncompliance with chapter 15.4 et seq. of title 46, the division shall proceed, with or without notice, to make such investigation as it may deem necessary or convenient. But no order affecting the rates, tolls, charges, regulations, measurements, practice, act, or service complained of shall be entered by the division without a formal public hearing. When any complaint shall be made by twenty-five (25) or more qualified electors, the complaint shall designate one of the complainants upon whom shall be served all notices, orders, and citations required by this chapter to be served upon complainants.

The term “safe and potable” shall mean the suitability or fitness for human consumption of drinking water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-3

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 7; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 6; P.L. 1977, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 188, § 4.

39-4-4.
Notice of complaint — Time and place of hearing.

The division shall, prior to a formal hearing, notify the public utility complained of that a complaint has been made, and ten (10) days after notice has been given, the division may proceed to set a time and place for a hearing and an investigation as hereinafter provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-4

.

39-4-5.
Notice of hearing on complaint — Right to appear and summon witnesses.

The division shall give the public utility and the complainant, if any, ten (10) days’ notice of the time and place where and when the hearing and investigation will be held, and the matters considered and determined. Both the public utility and the complainant shall be entitled to be heard and appear by counsel, and shall have process to enforce the attendance of witnesses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-5

.

39-4-6.
Separation of issues — Damage to complainant not required.

The division may, in its discretion, when complaint is made of more than one rate or charge, order separate hearings thereon, and may consider and determine the several matters complained of separately and at such time as it may prescribe. No complaint shall at any time be dismissed because of the absence of direct damage to the complainant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 22; P.L. 1953, ch. 3209, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-6

.

39-4-7.
Hearings in locality of consumers affected.

In any matter within the jurisdiction of the division of public utilities and carriers, involving water rates, charges, or accommodation of the public, or the safety or potability of drinking water, and affecting the inhabitants of any particular community in any town or city, the division, upon request of the town or city council, as the case may be, so affected, shall hold at least one session of the public hearing on the matter within the county where the town or city is located; provided, however, the provisions of this section shall not apply to chapter 12 of this title; and provided, further, however, that the requesting authority shall provide suitable accommodation to be supplied by the town or city council, as the case may be, requesting the hearing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 22; P.L. 1953, ch. 3209, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-7

; P.L. 1977, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 3.

39-4-8.
Filing of contracts.

Upon any hearing and investigation, the division may require the public utility to file with it a copy of any contract for the purchase of electricity, light, heat, or power, certified by its secretary or treasurer, which shall be open to inspection by the complainant or counsel for the complainant, and the division may consider the reasonableness of the amounts to be paid in accordance with the provisions of the contract for electricity, light, heat, or power insofar as the amounts shall be relevant to the matters subject to discussion at the hearing and investigation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 21; P.L. 1926, ch. 778, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-9.
Orders fixing rates.

If, upon a hearing and investigation had under the provisions of this chapter, the division shall find any existing rates, tolls, charges, or joint rate or rates of any public utility, to be unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory, or to be preferential or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of chapters 1 — 5 of this title, the division shall have power to fix and order a substitute therefor the rates, tolls, charges, or joint rates as shall be just and reasonable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 21; P.L. 1926, ch. 778, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-9

.

39-4-10.
Orders as to unreasonable practices or inadequate services.

If, upon a hearing and investigation had under the provisions of this chapter, the division of public utilities and carriers shall find that any regulation, measurement, practice, act, or service or any public utility is unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, preferential, unjustly discriminatory, or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of chapters 1 — 5 of this title, or that any service of the public utility is inadequate, or that any service that can be reasonably demanded cannot be obtained, the division shall have power to substitute therefor other regulations, measurements, practices, service, or acts, and to make the order respecting, and the changes in the regulations, measurements, practices, service, or acts, as shall be just and reasonable, and the power to order refunds as provided for in §

39-3-13.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-10

; P.L. 1975, ch. 276, § 2.

39-4-11.
Orders as to unsafe or improper conditions.

If, upon a hearing and investigation, the division shall find that the regulations, practices, acts, plant or equipment, appliances, or service of any public utility, or any condition suffered, permitted, or maintained by any public utility is unsafe and nonpotable or improper, or that the public safety is endangered thereby, the division shall by order determine the proper regulations, practices, acts, plant or equipment, appliances, or service thereafter to be in force and to be observed, maintained, and used by the public utility, and may by order require any dangerous, improper, unsafe, and nonpotable condition to be removed or remedied.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-11

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 8; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 6; P.L. 1977, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 3.

39-4-11.1.
Order to rebate or cancel charges.

Whenever the division of public utilities and carriers is in receipt of a determination that drinking water is not safe and potable, as determined by certification of the director of health, the division shall thereupon order the public utility to rebate to or credit the accounts of its consumers, the cost of the drinking water distributed during the period, or a portion thereof, as the division, by its rules and regulations, may determine; and, provided further, that the director of health shall certify to the division the date upon which it is determined that drinking water is restored to safety and potability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 253, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 3.

39-4-12.
Payment of investigation expense by utility.

If, upon a hearing and investigation, it shall be found that any rate, toll, charge, or joint rate or rates is unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory or preferential or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of this title, or that any regulation, measurement, practice, act, or service complained of is unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, preferential, or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of this title, or if it is found that any service is inadequate or that any reasonable service cannot be obtained, the public utility found to be at fault shall, if the commission finds the utility to have knowingly and intentionally violated the provisions, pay the expenses incurred by the division in the investigation and hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-12

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 7.

39-4-13.
Summary investigation by division.

Whenever the division shall believe that any of the rates, tolls, charges, or any joint rate or rates, charged, demanded, exacted, or collected by any public utility are in any respect unreasonable or unjustly discriminatory or otherwise in violation of this title, or that any regulation, measurement, practice, or act whatsoever of the public utility, affecting or relating to the conveyance of persons or property, or any service in connection therewith, or affecting or relating to the production, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of heat, light, water, or power, or any service in connection therewith, or the conveyance of telephone or telegraph messages, or any service in connection therewith, is in any respect unreasonable, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory; or that any service of the public utility is inadequate or cannot be obtained, or is unsafe, or the public health is endangered thereby; or that an investigation of any matter relating to a public utility should, for any reason be made, it shall summarily investigate the same with or without notice as it shall deem proper. The summary investigation as provided under this section shall be in addition to the hearings conducted pursuant to the provisions of §§

39-3-7

and

39-3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 7; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 9; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-14.
Formal investigation — Notice to utility.

If, after making a summary investigation, the division becomes satisfied that sufficient grounds exist to warrant a formal hearing being ordered as to the matters so investigated, it shall furnish to the public utility interested, a statement notifying the public utility of the matters under investigation. Ten (10) days after the notice has been given, the division may proceed to set a time and place for a hearing and investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-14

.

39-4-15.
Notice and proceedings on motion of division.

Notice of the time and place for a hearing and investigation shall be given to the public utility and to such other interested persons as the division shall deem necessary, as provided in §

39-4-5

, and thereafter the proceedings shall be had and conducted in reference to the matter investigated in like manner as though a complaint had been filed with the division relative to the matter investigated, and the same order or orders may be made in reference thereto as if the hearing and investigation had been made on a complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-15

.

39-4-16.
Service of orders — Effective date.

The division shall cause a certified copy of all its orders to be served upon an officer or agent of the public utility affected thereby, and upon the complainant if any there be, and all orders shall of their own force take effect and become operative ten (10) days after service thereof unless a different time be fixed by the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-16

.

39-4-17.
Rescission or alteration of orders.

The public utilities administrator may, at any time, upon notice to the public utility and after opportunity to be heard as provided in §

39-4-5

, rescind, alter, or amend any order fixing any rate, toll, charge, joint rate or rates, or any other order made by the public utilities administrator, and certified copies of the order shall be served and take effect as provided in §

39-4-16

for original orders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 30; P.L. 1949, ch. 2174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-17

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-18.
Review of grade crossing ordinances.

All orders, decisions, requests, or ordinances hereafter made by any town or city council under the provisions of §§

39-8-2

,

39-8-3

, and

39-8-12

, shall be subject to the supervision and control of the division as provided in this section. Upon the written complaint of any public utility, or by ten (10) qualified electors, residents of the town or city, the order of whose town or city council shall be drawn in question, upon the ground that the order, decision, request, or ordinance is unreasonable, the division shall set a hearing as provided in §

39-4-4

, and if the commission shall find that the order, decision, request, or ordinance is unreasonable, the order, decision, request, or ordinance shall be void; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to take away or limit the existing powers of the town or city councils to abolish grade crossings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 54; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 50; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-18

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 7; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-19, 39-4-20.
[Repealed.]

39-4-21.
Privilege against self-incrimination.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any books, accounts, papers, records, or documents in any investigation or inquiry by, or upon any hearing before, the division or member thereof when ordered to do so by the division or member, upon the ground that the testimony or evidence, accounts, papers, records, books, or documents, required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to penalty or forfeiture; but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any act, transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she shall, under oath, by order of the division or a member thereof, have testified or produced the documentary evidence; provided, that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury committed by him or her in his or her testimony. Nothing contained in this section is intended to give or shall be construed as in any manner giving any corporation immunity of any kind from the law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-21

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 107.

39-4-22.
Penalties for violations.

Every public utility or water supplier pursuant to chapter 15.4 of title 46 [repealed], and all officers and agents thereof, shall obey, observe, and comply with every order of the division made under the authority of chapters 1 — 5 of this title as long as the order shall be and remain in force. Every public utility or water supplier that shall violate any of the provisions of the chapters or that fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe, or comply with any order of the division, shall be subject to a penalty of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each and every offense. Every violation of the order shall be a separate and distinct offense and, in case of a continuing violation, every day’s continuance thereof shall be, and be deemed to be, a separate and distinct offense. Every officer, agent, or employee of a public utility or water supplier who shall violate any of the provisions of the chapters, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any public utility or water supplier, or who shall fail to obey, observe, or comply with any order of the division, or any provision of an order of the division, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility or water supplier in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any order or provision, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). In construing and enforcing the provisions of this section, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or other person acting for or employed by any public utility or water supplier, acting within the scope of his or her employment, shall in every case be deemed to be also the act, omission, or failure of the public utility or water supplier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-22

; P.L. 1980, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 188, § 4.

39-4-23.
Action in supreme court to prevent violations.

Whenever the division shall be of the opinion that a public utility, subject to its supervision, is failing or omitting, or about to fail or omit, to do anything required of it by law or by order of the division, or is doing anything, is about to do anything, or is permitting anything, or is about to permit anything to be done contrary to or in violation of law or of any order of the division, it shall direct the attorney general to commence an action or proceeding in the supreme court in the name of the division for the purpose of having the violations or threatened violations prevented. The attorney general shall thereupon begin the action or proceeding by petition to the supreme court, alleging the violation or threatened violation complained of, and praying for appropriate relief. It shall thereupon be the duty of the court to specify a time not exceeding twenty (20) days after the service of the copy of the petition, within which the public utility complained of must answer the petition, and in the meantime the public utility may be restrained. In the case of a default in answering, or after the answer, the court shall immediately inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case. Such corporations or persons as the court may deem necessary or proper to be joined as parties in order to make its judgment, order, or writ effective, may be joined as parties. The final judgment in any action or proceeding, shall either dismiss the action or proceeding or direct that appropriate relief be granted as prayed for in the petition, or in modified or other form.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-23

.

39-4-24.
Actions for penalties and forfeitures.

An action to recover a penalty or forfeiture under this chapter shall be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state in the name of the state, and shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the administrator. All money recovered in any action, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury. Any action may be discontinued or compromised on application of the administrator upon such terms as the court shall approve and order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 29; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 122; G.L. 1956, §

39-4-24

.